Utah statutes.
53-7-408.   Inspection.
To enforce the provisions of this part, the attorney general and the state
fire marshal are hereby authorized to examine the books, papers, invoices, and
other records of any person in possession, control, or occupancy of any
premises where cigarettes are placed, stored, sold, or offered for sale, as
well as the stock of cigarettes on the premises.  Every person in the
possession, control, or occupancy of any premises where cigarettes are placed,
sold, or offered for sale, is hereby directed and required to give the
attorney general and the state fire marshal the means, facilities, and
opportunity for the examinations authorized by this section.
